apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix
<pardef n="dramatur/g__n"   >
    <e><p><l>g</l><r>g<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ga</l><r>g<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>gu</l><r>g<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ga</l><r>g<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>že</l><r>g<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>gu</l><r>g<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>gom</l><r>g<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>zi</l><r>g<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ga</l><r>g<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>zima</l><r>g<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ge</l><r>g<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>zi</l><r>g<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>zima</l><r>g<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>zima</l><r>g<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="obeli/sk__n"   >
    <e><p><l>sk</l><r>sk<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ska</l><r>sk<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>sku</l><r>sk<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>sk</l><r>sk<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>šče</l><r>sk<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>sku</l><r>sk<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>skom</l><r>sk<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>sci</l><r>sk<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ska</l><r>sk<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e r="LR"><p><l>saka</l><r>sk<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>scima</l><r>sk<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ske</l><r>sk<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>sci</l><r>sk<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>scima</l><r>sk<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>scima</l><r>sk<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pradjed__n"   >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ova</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>  
    <e><p><l>ove</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="oču/h__n"   >
    <e><p><l>h</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ha</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>hu</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ha</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>hu</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>hu</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>hom</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>si</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ha</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>sima</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>he</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>si</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>sima</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>sima</l><r>h<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="govor__n"   >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="dramaturg"><i>dramatur</i><par n="dramatur/g__n" /></e>
<e lm="obelisk"><i>obeli</i><par n="obeli/sk__n" /></e>
<e lm="pradjed"><i>pradjed</i><par n="pradjed__n" /></e>
<e lm="očuh"><i>oču</i><par n="oču/h__n" /></e>
<e lm="govor"><i>govor</i><par n="govor__n" /></e>
